hun-lex.lexc
! Hungarian Noun Lexicon

Multichar_Symbols +Pl +Sg +PossPl +Poss1PSg +Poss2PSg +Poss3PSg +Poss1PPl 
+Poss2PPl +Poss3PPl +NomPoss +NomPossPl +Nom +Acc +Illa +Iness +Ela 
+Subla +SuperEss +Dela +Alla +Adess +Abla +Dat +Instr +Trans +CausFin 
+EssForm +Term +Distr +Soc 

LEXICON ROOT
	Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns
RegStems ; 		!Regular stems
IrregStems ; 	!Irregular stems
FleetVowelStems ;
VStems ; 		!V-adding stems

LEXICON RegStems
ismerős RegSuff ; 
barát RegSuff ;
szék RegSuff ;
bűn RegSuff ;
lámpa RegSuff ;
csésze RegSuff ;
nő RegSuff ;
hajó RegSuff ;
kapu RegSuff ;
tű RegSuff ;
lány RegSuff ;

LEXICON FleetVowelStems
bokor NumberSpec ;
bokr FleetSuff ;
iker NumberSpec ;
ikr FleetSuff ;
köröm NumberSpec ;
körm FleetSuff ;

LEXICON VStems 
cső NumberSpec ;    
csőv VStemSuff ;
ló NumberSpec;   
lov VStemSuff ;
hó NumberSpec ;  
hav VStemSuff ;
mű NumberSpec ; 
műv VStemSuff ;

LEXICON IrregStems
uralom IrregSuff ;
rejtelem IrregSuff ;
kéz IrregSuff ; 
levél IrregSuff ;
pohár IrregSuff ;
út IrregSuff ;
víz IrregSuff ;
ház IrregSuff ;
könyv IrregSuff ;
őz IrregSuff ;
ügy IrregSuff ;

LEXICON RegSuff
RegNumber ;
RegPossNumber ; !ai
RegPossessive ;
RegNonAtrPoss ;

LEXICON IrregSuff
IrregNumber ;
IrregPossNumber ; !ai/ei
IrregNonAtrPoss ; !e
IrregPossessive ;

LEXICON FleetSuff
FleetNumber ;
FleetNonAtrPoss ; ! ei
FleetPossessive ;
FleetPossNumber ;

LEXICON VStemSuff
VStemNumber ;
IrregPossNumber ;
IrregPossessive ;
IrregNonAtrPoss ;

LEXICON RegNumber
+Sg:0 RegCaseSG ;
+Pl:Ok RegNonAtrPoss ;
+Pl:Ok RegCasePL ;
RegPossNumber ;

LEXICON IrregNumber
+Sg:0 IrregCaseSG ;
+Pl:Ak IrregNonAtrPoss ;
+Pl:Ak IrregCasePL;
IrregPossNumber ;

LEXICON FleetNumber
+Sg:0 FleetCaseSpecSG ;
+Pl:Ok RegNonAtrPoss ;
+Pl:Ok RegCasePL ;
RegPossNumber ;

LEXICON VStemNumber
+Sg:0 CaseSpec1SG ;
+Pl:Ak IrregNonAtrPoss ;
+Pl:Ak IrregCasePL;
IrregPossNumber ;

LEXICON NumberSpec
+Sg:0 CaseSpec ;

LEXICON RegPossNumber
+PossPl:Yi RegPossPl ; 

LEXICON IrregPossNumber
+PossPl:Yi IrregPossPl ;

LEXICON FleetPossNumber
+PossPl:Yi FleetPossPl ;

LEXICON RegPossessive
+Poss1PSg:Om RegSuff2 ; !1PSg
+Poss2PSg:Od RegSuff2 ; !2PSg
+Poss3PSg:jO RegSuff2 ;  !3PSg
+Poss1PPl:Unk RegSuff2 ; !1PPl
+Poss2PPl:OtOk RegSuff2 ; !2PPl
+Poss3PPl:jUk RegSuff2 ; !3PPl

LEXICON RegSuff2
RegNonAtrPoss ;
RegCasePL ;

LEXICON FleetPossessive
+Poss1PSg:Om FleetSuff2 ; !1PSg
+Poss2PSg:Od FleetSuff2 ; !2PSg
+Poss3PSg:O FleetSuff2 ;  !3PSg
+Poss1PPl:Unk FleetSuff2 ; !1PPl
+Poss2PPl:OtOk FleetSuff2 ; !2PPl
+Poss3PPl:Uk FleetSuff2 ; !3PPl

LEXICON FleetSuff2
FleetNonAtrPoss ;
FleetCaseSpecPL ;
CaseSpec ;

LEXICON IrregPossessive
+Poss1PSg:Am IrregSuff2 ; !1PSg
+Poss2PSg:Ad IrregSuff2 ; !2PSg
+Poss3PSg:A IrregSuff2 ;  !3PSg
+Poss1PPl:Unk IrregSuff2 ; !1PPl
+Poss2PPl:AtOk IrregSuff2; !2PPl
+Poss3PPl:Uk IrregSuff2 ; !3PPl

LEXICON IrregSuff2
IrregCasePL ;
IrregNonAtrPoss ;

LEXICON RegPossPl
+Poss1PSg:m RegSuff3 ; !1PSg
+Poss2PSg:d RegSuff3 ; !2PSg
+Poss3PSg:0 RegSuff3 ; !3PSg
+Poss1PPl:nk RegSuff3 ; !1PPl
+Poss2PPl:tEk RegSuff3 ; !2PPl
+Poss3PPl:k RegSuff3 ; !3PPl

LEXICON RegSuff3
RegNonAtrPoss ;
RegCasePL ;

LEXICON IrregPossPl
+Poss1PSg:m IrregSuff3 ; !1PSg
+Poss2PSg:d IrregSuff3 ; !2PSg
+Poss3PSg:0 IrregSuff3 ; !3PSg
+Poss1PPl:nk IrregSuff3 ; !1PPl
+Poss2PPl:tEk IrregSuff3 ; !2PPl
+Poss3PPl:k IrregSuff3 ; !3PPl

LEXICON IrregSuff3
IrregCasePL ;
IrregNonAtrPoss ;

LEXICON FleetPossPl
+Poss1PSg:m FleetSuff3 ; !1PSg
+Poss2PSg:d FleetSuff3 ; !2PSg
+Poss3PSg:0 FleetSuff3 ; !3PSg
+Poss1PPl:nk FleetSuff3 ; !1PPl
+Poss2PPl:tEk FleetSuff3 ; !2PPl
+Poss3PPl:k FleetSuff3 ; !3PPl

LEXICON FleetSuff3
FleetNonAtrPoss ;
FleetCaseSpecPL ;
CaseSpec ;

LEXICON RegNonAtrPoss
+NomPoss:é RegNonAtrCase ;
+NomPoss:é RegNomAtrPossNumber ;

LEXICON RegNomAtrPossNumber
+NomPossPl:i RegNonAtrCase ;

LEXICON IrregNonAtrPoss
+NomPoss:é IrregNonAtrCase ;
+NomPoss:é IrregNomAtrPossNumber ;

LEXICON IrregNomAtrPossNumber
+NomPossPl:i IrregNonAtrCase ;

LEXICON FleetNonAtrPoss
+NomPoss:é FleetNonAtrCase ;
+NomPoss:é FleetNomAtrPossNumber ;

LEXICON FleetNomAtrPossNumber
+NomPossPl:i FleetNonAtrCase ;

LEXICON RegCaseSG
+Nom:0 # ;
+Acc:Öt # ; 
+Illa:bÄ # ;  !Ä -> a/e
+Iness:bÄn # ; 
+Ela:bÓl # ;  !Ó -> ó/ő
+Subla:rÄ # ; 
+SuperEss:Ön # ; 
+Dela:rÓl # ;  !Ó -> ó/ő
+Alla:hÖz # ; 
+Adess:nÄl # ; 
+Abla:tÓl # ; !Ó -> ó/ő
+Dat:nÄk # ; 
+Instr:vÄl # ; 
+Trans:vÄ # ; 
+CausFin:ért # ;
+EssForm:ként # ; 
+Term:ig # ;
+Distr:Önként # ;
+Soc:ÖstUl # ;

LEXICON RegNonAtrCase
+Nom:0 # ;
+Acc:Öt # ; 

LEXICON RegCasePL
+Nom:0 # ;
+Acc:Öt # ; 
+Illa:bÄ # ;  !Ä -> a/e
+Iness:bÄn # ; 
+Ela:bÓl # ;  !Ó -> ó/ő
+Subla:rÄ # ; 
+SuperEss:Ön # ; 
+Dela:rÓl # ;  !Ó -> ó/ő
+Alla:hÖz # ; 
+Adess:nÄl # ; 
+Abla:tÓl # ; !Ó -> ó/ő
+Dat:nÄk # ; 
+Instr:vÄl # ; 
+Trans:vÄ # ; 
+CausFin:ért # ;
+EssForm:ként # ; 
+Term:ig # ;

LEXICON IrregCaseSG
+Nom:0 # ;
+Acc:Ât # ; 
+Illa:bÄ # ; !Ä -> a/e
+Iness:bÄn # ;
+Ela:bÓl # ;  !Ó -> ó/ő
+Subla:rÄ # ; 
+SuperEss:Ön # ; !Supe
+Dela:rÓl # ; !Ó -> ó/ő
+Alla:hÖz # ;
+Adess:nÄl # ;
+Abla:tÓl # ;
+Dat:nÄk # ; 
+Instr:vÄl # ; 
+Trans:vÄ # ; 
+CausFin:ért # ;
+EssForm:ként # ;
+Term:ig # ; !Term
+Distr:Ânként # ;
+Soc:ÂstUl # ;

LEXICON IrregNonAtrCase
+Nom:0 # ;
+Acc:Ât # ;

LEXICON IrregCasePL
+Nom:0 # ;
+Acc:Ât # ; 
+Illa:bÄ # ; !Ä -> a/e
+Iness:bÄn # ;
+Ela:bÓl # ;  !Ó -> ó/ő
+Subla:rÄ # ; 
+SuperEss:Ön # ; !Superessive
+Dela:rÓl # ; !Ó -> ó/ő
+Alla:hÖz # ;
+Adess:nÄl # ;
+Abla:tÓl # ;
+Dat:nÄk # ; 
+Instr:vÄl # ; 
+Trans:vÄ # ; 
+CausFin:ért # ;
+EssForm:ként # ;
+Term:ig # ;

LEXICON CaseSpec1SG
+Acc:Ât # ; 
+SuperEss:Ön # ;
+Distr:Ânként # ; 
+Soc:ÂstUl # ; 

LEXICON CaseSpec
+Nom:0 # ;
+Illa:bÄ # ;  !Ä -> a/e
+Iness:bÄn # ;
+Ela:bÓl # ; ! Ó -> ó/ő
+Subla:rÄ # ; 
+Dela:rÓl # ;  !Ó -> ó/ő
+Alla:hÖz # ; 
+Adess:nÄl # ; 
+Abla:tÓl # ;  !Ó -> ó/ő
+Dat:nÄk # ; 
+Instr:vÄl # ;
+Trans:vÄ # ; 
+CausFin:ért # ; 
+EssForm:ként # ; 
+Term:ig # ; 

LEXICON FleetCaseSpecSG
+Acc:Öt # ; 
+SuperEss:Ön # ;
+Distr:Önként # ; 
+Soc:ÂstUl # ; 

LEXICON FleetCaseSpecPL
+Nom:0 # ;
+Acc:Öt # ; 
+SuperEss:Ön # ;

LEXICON FleetNonAtrCase
+Nom:0 # ;
+Acc:Öt # ;
